Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-895
Interstate bridges; agreements with adjoining states and the United States.

All agreements made between the department and an adjoining state under the authority of sections 39-891 to 39-8,122 shall be made by the department in the name of the State of Nebraska, with the advice of the State Highway Commission and the consent of the Governor. Any provision of sections 39-891 to 39-8,122 which authorizes the department to enter into an agreement with an adjoining state shall also be deemed to grant the department the necessary authority to carry out the provisions of any such agreement. In addition:

(1) Any agreement made between the department and an authorized agency, bureau, commission, department, or officer of the states of Colorado, Iowa, Kansas, Missouri, South Dakota, or Wyoming shall be construed to be an agreement with an adjoining state;

(2) Any provision of sections 39-891 to 39-8,122 authorizing agreements between the department and an adjoining state shall be deemed to authorize the inclusion of the United States to the whole or any part of such agreement whenever the department and the adjoining state deem such inclusion either necessary or desirable; and

(3) Any agreement made by the department and an adjoining state with an authorized agency, bureau, commission, department, or officer of the federal government shall be construed to be an agreement with the United States.

Laws 1959, c. 175, § 5, p. 635.